public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dict-vec-oxt/dictionaries/ved.aff
FLAG UTF-8
# vèrbi -àr
# themeT1 + r/aE
# themeT8 + o/aJL
# themeT9 + eme/gH
SFX a Y 609
SFX a 0 à/JLNR ar
SFX a 0 àe/R ar
SFX a 0 è/JL ar
SFX a 0 èmi/K ar
SFX a 0 é/P ar
SFX a 0 émoi/M ar
SFX a 0 ésimo/L ar
SFX a 0 ésimoi/M ar
SFX a 0 éu/Q ar
SFX a 0 ía/JLNR ar
SFX a 0 íami/K ar
SFX a 0 íatu/O ar
SFX a 0 íeƚo/B ar
SFX a 0 íe/JLR ar
SFX a 0 íelo/B ar
SFX a 0 íemi/K ar
SFX a 0 ò/JL ar
SFX a 0 òmi/K ar
SFX a 0 aƚo/B ar
SFX a 0 alo/B ar
SFX a 0 ami/K ar
SFX a 0 atu/O ar
SFX a 0 ave/RS ar
SFX a 0 emo/L ar
SFX a 0 en/L ar
SFX a 0 eni/M ar
SFX a 0 ense ar
SFX a 0 esi/P ar
SFX a 0 esiu/Q ar
SFX a 0 ié/P ar
SFX a 0 iéu/Q ar
SFX a 0 ion/L [^cijɉñ]ar
SFX a 0 on/L [cijɉñ]ar
SFX a 0 ioni/M [^cijɉñ]ar
SFX a 0 oni/M [cijɉñ]ar
SFX a 0 ionse [^cijɉñ]ar
SFX a 0 onse [cijɉñ]ar
SFX a 0 isen/L ar
SFX a 0 iseni/M ar
SFX a 0 isense ar
SFX a 0 isié/P ar
SFX a 0 isiéu/Q ar
SFX a 0 ision/L ar
SFX a 0 isioni/M ar
SFX a 0 isionse ar
SFX a 0 ison/L ar
SFX a 0 isoni/M ar
SFX a 0 isonse ar
SFX a 0 onse ar
SFX a ar à ar
SFX a ar àa/JLPR ar
SFX a ar àami/K ar
SFX a ar àau/Q ar
SFX a ar àeƚo/B ar
SFX a ar àe/JL ar
SFX a ar àelo/B ar
SFX a ar àemi/K ar
SFX a ar ài/NP ar
SFX a ar àimo/L ar
SFX a ar àimoi/M ar
SFX a ar àitu/O ar
SFX a ar àndome/G ar
SFX a ar ào/JL ar
SFX a ar àomi/K ar
SFX a ar àrmene/G ar
SFX a ar àsimo ar
SFX a ar àvami/K ar
SFX a ar àvau/Q ar
SFX a ar àveƚo/B ar
SFX a ar àvelo/B ar
SFX a ar àvemi/K ar
SFX a ar àvimo/L ar
SFX a ar àvimoi/M ar
SFX a ar àvitu/O ar
SFX a ar àvomi/K ar
SFX a ar è/FP ar
SFX a ar ème/H ar
SFX a ar èu/Q ar
SFX a ar é/FP ar
SFX a ar éa/JLPR ar
SFX a ar éami/K ar
SFX a ar éau/Q ar
SFX a ar éeƚo/B ar
SFX a ar ée/JL ar
SFX a ar éelo/B ar
SFX a ar éemi/K ar
SFX a ar éi/NP ar
SFX a ar éimo/L ar
SFX a ar éimoi/M ar
SFX a ar éitu/O ar
SFX a ar émoi/M ar
SFX a ar éndome/G ar
SFX a ar éo/JL ar
SFX a ar éomi/K ar
SFX a ar ésimo ar
SFX a ar éu/Q ar
SFX a ar évami/K ar
SFX a ar évau/Q ar
SFX a ar éveƚo/B ar
SFX a ar évelo/B ar
SFX a ar évemi/K ar
SFX a ar évimo/L ar
SFX a ar évimoi/M ar
SFX a ar évitu/O ar
SFX a ar évomi/K ar
SFX a ar ede ar
SFX a ar ege ar
SFX a ar eme/H ar
SFX a ar emo/L ar
SFX a ar en/L ar
SFX a ar endo/E ar
SFX a ar ene ar
SFX a ar eni/M ar
SFX a ar ense ar
SFX a ar erà/JLNR ar
SFX a ar eràe/R ar
SFX a ar erè/JL ar
SFX a ar erèmi/K ar
SFX a ar eré/P ar
SFX a ar erémoi/M ar
SFX a ar erésimo/L ar
SFX a ar erésimoi/M ar
SFX a ar eréu/Q ar
SFX a ar ería/JLNR ar
SFX a ar eríami/K ar
SFX a ar eríatu/O ar
SFX a ar eríeƚo/B ar
SFX a ar eríe/JLR ar
SFX a ar eríelo/B ar
SFX a ar eríemi/K ar
SFX a ar erò/JL ar
SFX a ar eròmi/K ar
SFX a ar eraƚo/B ar
SFX a ar eralo/B ar
SFX a ar erami/K ar
SFX a ar eratu/O ar
SFX a ar erave/RS ar
SFX a ar eremo/L ar
SFX a ar eren/L ar
SFX a ar ereni/M ar
SFX a ar erense ar
SFX a ar eresi/P ar
SFX a ar eresiu/Q ar
SFX a ar erié/P ar
SFX a ar eriéu/Q ar
SFX a ar erion/L ar
SFX a ar erioni/M ar
SFX a ar erionse ar
SFX a ar erisen/L ar
SFX a ar eriseni/M ar
SFX a ar erisense ar
SFX a ar erisié/P ar
SFX a ar erisiéu/Q ar
SFX a ar erision/L ar
SFX a ar erisioni/M ar
SFX a ar erisionse ar
SFX a ar erison/L ar
SFX a ar erisoni/M ar
SFX a ar erisonse ar
SFX a ar eron/L ar
SFX a ar eroni/M ar
SFX a ar eronse ar
SFX a ar ese/I ar
SFX a ar esi ar
SFX a ar esto/BI ar
SFX a ar eva/JLPR ar
SFX a ar eve/JL ar
SFX a ar evi/NP ar
SFX a ar evo/JL ar
SFX a ar ié/P ar
SFX a ar iéu/Q ar
SFX a ar iede/P ar
SFX a ar iege/P ar
SFX a ar ion/L [^cijɉñ]ar
SFX a ar on/L [cijɉñ]ar
SFX a ar ione [^cijɉñ]ar
SFX a ar one [cijɉñ]ar
SFX a ar ioni/M [^cijɉñ]ar
SFX a ar oni/M [cijɉñ]ar
SFX a ar ionse [^cijɉñ]ar
SFX a ar onse [cijɉñ]ar
SFX a ar isen/L ar
SFX a ar isene ar
SFX a ar iseni/M ar
SFX a ar isense ar
SFX a ar isié/P ar
SFX a ar isiede/P ar
SFX a ar isiege/P ar
SFX a ar ision/L ar
SFX a ar isione ar
SFX a ar isioni/M ar
SFX a ar isionse ar
SFX a ar ison/L ar
SFX a ar isone ar
SFX a ar isoni/M ar
SFX a ar isonse ar
SFX a ar iven/L ar
SFX a ar iveni/M ar
SFX a ar ivense ar
SFX a ar ivié/P ar
SFX a ar iviéu/Q ar
SFX a ar ivion/L ar
SFX a ar ivioni/M ar
SFX a ar ivionse ar
SFX a ar ivon/L ar
SFX a ar ivoni/M ar
SFX a ar ivonse ar
SFX a o a/FR o
SFX a o e/IJLR o
SFX a o i/N o
SFX a o o/JL o
SFX a r do/B ar
SFX a r ndo/E ar
SFX a r nte ar
SFX a r rà/JLNR ar
SFX a r ràe/R ar
SFX a r rè/JL ar
SFX a r rèmi/K ar
SFX a r ré/P ar
SFX a r rémoi/M ar
SFX a r résimo/L ar
SFX a r résimoi/M ar
SFX a r réu/Q ar
SFX a r ría/JLNR ar
SFX a r ríami/K ar
SFX a r ríatu/O ar
SFX a r ríeƚo/B ar
SFX a r ríe/JLR ar
SFX a r ríelo/B ar
SFX a r ríemi/K ar
SFX a r rò/JL ar
SFX a r ròmi/K ar
SFX a r raƚo/B ar
SFX a r ralo/B ar
SFX a r rami/K ar
SFX a r ratu/O ar
SFX a r rave/RS ar
SFX a r re ar
SFX a r remo/L ar
SFX a r ren/L ar
SFX a r reni/M ar
SFX a r rense ar
SFX a r resi/P ar
SFX a r resiu/Q ar
SFX a r rié/P ar
SFX a r riéu/Q ar
SFX a r rion/L ar
SFX a r rioni/M ar
SFX a r rionse ar
SFX a r risen/L ar
SFX a r riseni/M ar
SFX a r risense ar
SFX a r risié/P ar
SFX a r risiéu/Q ar
SFX a r rision/L ar
SFX a r risioni/M ar
SFX a r risionse ar
SFX a r rison/L ar
SFX a r risoni/M ar
SFX a r risonse ar
SFX a r rme/G ar
SFX a r ron/L ar
SFX a r roni/M ar
SFX a r ronse ar
SFX a r se/I ar
SFX a r si ar
SFX a r sto/BI ar
SFX a r va/JLPR ar
SFX a r ve/JL ar
SFX a r vi/NP ar
SFX a r vo/JL ar
SFX a andar vè/FP [^aàbcdđeéèfghiíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]andar
SFX a andar vèu/Q [^aàbcdđeéèfghiíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]andar
SFX a andar vé/FP [^aàbcdđeéèfghiíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]andar
SFX a andar vémoi/M [^aàbcdđeéèfghiíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]andar
SFX a andar véu/Q [^aàbcdđeéèfghiíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]andar
SFX a andar vede [^aàbcdđeéèfghiíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]andar
SFX a andar vege [^aàbcdđeéèfghiíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]andar
SFX a andar veme/H [^aàbcdđeéèfghiíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]andar
SFX a andar vemo/L [^aàbcdđeéèfghiíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]andar
SFX a andar ven/L [^aàbcdđeéèfghiíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]andar
SFX a andar vene [^aàbcdđeéèfghiíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]andar
SFX a andar veni/M [^aàbcdđeéèfghiíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]andar
SFX a andar vion [^aàbcdđeéèfghiíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]andar
SFX a andar vione [^aàbcdđeéèfghiíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]andar
SFX a andar von/L [^aàbcdđeéèfghiíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]andar
SFX a andar vone [^aàbcdđeéèfghiíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]andar
SFX a andar voni/M [^aàbcdđeéèfghiíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]andar
SFX a ando và/FNR [^aàbcdđeéèfghiíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]ando
SFX a ando vàeƚo/B [^aàbcdđeéèfghiíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]ando
SFX a ando vàelo/B [^aàbcdđeéèfghiíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]ando
SFX a ando vàemi/K [^aàbcdđeéèfghiíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]ando
SFX a ando vàgomi/K [^aàbcdđeéèfghiíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]ando
SFX a ando vàomi/K [^aàbcdđeéèfghiíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]ando
SFX a ando vaƚo/B [^aàbcdđeéèfghiíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]ando
SFX a ando vaa [^aàbcdđeéèfghiíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]ando
SFX a ando vae/JLR [^aàbcdđeéèfghiíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]ando
SFX a ando vaga [^aàbcdđeéèfghiíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]ando
SFX a ando vagi [^aàbcdđeéèfghiíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]ando
SFX a ando vago/JL [^aàbcdđeéèfghiíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]ando
SFX a ando vai [^aàbcdđeéèfghiíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]ando
SFX a ando valo/B [^aàbcdđeéèfghiíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]ando
SFX a ando vao/JL [^aàbcdđeéèfghiíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]ando
SFX a ando vatu/O [^aàbcdđeéèfghiíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]ando
SFX a andar vè/FP r[ei]andar
SFX a andar vèu/Q r[ei]andar
SFX a andar vé/FP r[ei]andar
SFX a andar vémoi/M r[ei]andar
SFX a andar véu/Q r[ei]andar
SFX a andar vede r[ei]andar
SFX a andar vege r[ei]andar
SFX a andar veme/H r[ei]andar
SFX a andar vemo/L r[ei]andar
SFX a andar ven/L r[ei]andar
SFX a andar vene r[ei]andar
SFX a andar veni/M r[ei]andar
SFX a andar vion r[ei]andar
SFX a andar vione r[ei]andar
SFX a andar von/L r[ei]andar
SFX a andar vone r[ei]andar
SFX a andar voni/M r[ei]andar
SFX a ando và/FNR r[ei]ando
SFX a ando vàeƚo/B r[ei]ando
SFX a ando vàelo/B r[ei]ando
SFX a ando vàemi/K r[ei]ando
SFX a ando vàgomi/K r[ei]ando
SFX a ando vàomi/K r[ei]ando
SFX a ando vaƚo/B r[ei]ando
SFX a ando vaa r[ei]ando
SFX a ando vae/JLR r[ei]ando
