public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dict-vec-oxt/dictionaries/ved.dic
àxito/aJL
ñòkolo/aJL
ónđar/aE
đenaraliđar/aE
ŧénxar/aE
ŧavarɉar/aE
ŧentralixar/aE
ŧimento/aJL
ƚàgremo/aJL
ƚanpixo/aJL
ƚedro/aJL
ƚiko/aJL
ƚoko/aJL
ɉúbilo/aJL
ɉutar/aE
aƚegrar/aE
abonar/aE
adoƚoro/aJL
afrankar/aE
akuo/aJL
alborar/aE
amétar/aE
analiđo/aJL
antísipo/aJL
apasiono/aJL
arđaro/aJL
arfòso/aJL
arpiɉar/aE
arxinar/aE
asejar/aE
astrenđo/aJL
auguro/aJL
axornar/aE
bóɉar/aE
badajo/aJL
balanŧo/aJL
banpo/aJL
barono/aJL
batiđar/aE
bendar/aE
biankixar/aE
bisakar/aE
blokar/aE
bonifegar/aE
botedo/aJL
brúsketo/aJL
bramiđo/aJL
brindo/aJL
bruxar/aE
buxarar/aE
carlar/aE
cincinar/aE
députo/aJL
danedar/aE
deŧídar/aE
debutar/aE
dekórar/aE
demandar/aE
depéndar/aE
desídar/aE
deseleđar/aE
desfarenŧiar/aE
desfito/aJL
desido/aJL
deskaenaŧar/aE
deskapujar/aE
deskavedar/aE
deskonsakro/aJL
deskroxo/aJL
despétolo/aJL
desparexo/aJL
despigoƚar/aE
desprèŧio/aJL
dessarvelar/aE
destapono/aJL
destornar/aE
destrigar/aE
detarmino/aJL
dexñaro/aJL
dexanemar/aE
dexbaƚar/aE
dexbaular/aE
dexbotono/aJL
dexdào/aJL
dexgajo/aJL
dexgréndeno/aJL
dexguanto/aJL
dexlèguo/aJL
dexmòrŧo/aJL
dexmolar/aE
dexnoxeƚo/aJL
dexruvijo/aJL
dexvidar/aE
dispendo/aJL
dojiđo/aJL
dopiar/aE
eƚídar/aE
ekuipajar/aE
epílogo/aJL
espurgar/aE
evínsar/aE
exalar/aE
fàbrego/aJL
faŧar/aE
faliar/aE
faorèdo/aJL
fatuo/aJL
fendo/aJL
fiƚoxofar/aE
fino/aJL
flètar/aE
fondamento/aJL
fortedo/aJL
fradeƚar/aE
fransexo/aJL
fraternido/aJL
frondedar/aE
funŧionar/aE
góndoƚo/aJL
galeđo/aJL
garbo/aJL
gorgeđar/aE
grandedo/aJL
grilo/aJL
guastar/aE
ilunar/aE
inđaltrono/aJL
inŧeñar/aE
inɉèrmo/aJL
inakuar/aE
inarko/aJL
inbèrlo/aJL
inbaƚuko/aJL
inbaraŧo/aJL
inbavar/aE
inbixako/aJL
inbosar/aE
inbragetar/aE
inbrumar/aE
incapeto/aJL
indaltronar/aE
indogar/aE
industrio/aJL
infaldo/aJL
infetar/aE
influenŧo/aJL
infradeƚar/aE
infurio/aJL
ingalonar/aE
ingatejo/aJL
ingròso/aJL
ingrinŧar/aE
injòto/aJL
inkòrđo/aJL
inkaenasar/aE
inkanevar/aE
inkaratar/aE
inkastelar/aE
inkavar/aE
inkokonar/aE
inkontro/aJL
inkrosoƚar/aE
inkuro/aJL
inmaŧetar/aE
inmoɉar/aE
inojar/aE
inpícoƚo/aJL
inpacugar/aE
inparlo/aJL
inpaveɉo/aJL
inpegolar/aE
inpestar/aE
inpiro/aJL
inportar/aE
inprovixar/aE
insèlo/aJL
insalviar/aE
inseñorar/aE
inserco/aJL
inskeƚetrar/aE
insotar/aE
instalar/aE
insustar/aE
intaɉar/aE
intarkalar/aE
intaso/aJL
intenxo/aJL
intersar/aE
intortiɉo/aJL
intravèñar/aE
invarđèlo/aJL
invesigo/aJL
inxmerdar/aE
isperonar/aE
jegomarar/aE
kóniugo/aJL
kalivar/aE
kanono/aJL
karenar/aE
kautaridar/aE
koinvòlxar/aE
konbinar/aE
konpénetro/aJL
konsejar/aE
kontrabandono/aJL
kopiar/aE
kovèrdar/aE
krivelar/aE
kuadrixo/aJL
létaro/aJL
laurear/aE
lindar/aE
mèdego/aJL
mañetidar/aE
malisio/aJL
manometo/aJL
martelar/aE
mediar/aE
misio/aJL
mortifegar/aE
mutilar/aE
nikiar/aE
ocexo/aJL
ondixo/aJL
osarvar/aE
pétolo/aJL
padroneđo/aJL
pansar/aE
parixar/aE
parvèrtar/aE
pedorar/aE
perpetuar/aE
pexar/aE
piexar/aE
plàtino/aJL
pontoƚar/aE
preŧar/aE
priar/aE
protendo/aJL
règoƚo/aJL
rabiar/aE
rangar/aE
rato/aJL
realixo/aJL
recido/aJL
refuxo/aJL
rekapítoƚo/aJL
relasiono/aJL
renpiànđar/aE
resémeno/aJL
respirar/aE
revívar/aE
rientrar/aE
rodolar/aE
rotamar/aE
sàkoƚo/aJL
sòmo/aJL
sakrífego/aJL
sapoƚar/aE
scafido/aJL
scopado/aJL
sekolarixo/aJL
seraɉo/aJL
sfarino/aJL
sfondo/aJL
sfrixar/aE
sikoƚar/aE
sitono/aJL
skaƚino/aJL
skandaɉar/aE
skaregar/aE
skasar/aE
skisar/aE
skonbusoƚar/aE
skornar/aE
skrepoƚar/aE
skuercar/aE
sobojo/aJL
sopòrto/aJL
soscèñar/aE
soxàŧar/aE
spúntigo/aJL
spalpuño/aJL
spartègo/aJL
spelakio/aJL
spiŧo/aJL
spolinar/aE
spròno/aJL
stípuƚo/aJL
stansiar/aE
stipuƚar/aE
strúkolo/aJL
stralòso/aJL
straponxo/aJL
strufiño/aJL
sucédar/aE
tàxar/aE
takoƚar/aE
tarmenar/aE
teco/aJL
tikiño/aJL
torbio/aJL
trabokar/aE
tranguɉo/aJL
trateđar/aE
trinŧo/aJL
tuteƚar/aE
véndego/aJL
vardèlo/aJL
veƚar/aE	po:verb
vergido/aJL
visar/aE
xèmar/aE
xɉaventar/aE
xbíxego/aJL
xbakanar/aE
xbarluko/aJL
xbekotar/aE
xbigoƚar/aE
xbosegar/aE
xbrindelar/aE
xdento/aJL
xganasar/aE
xgolar/aE
xgravar/aE
xguinsar/aE
xlòvo/aJL
xlepar/aE
xmòjo/aJL
xmarasar/aE
xmerŧiar/aE
xmorgo/aJL
xogatolar/aE
xvaƚivar/aE
xverdèlo/aJL
